sv: Installationstillbehör som ingår: Häftremsor; Inga; Kryssmejsel; Plastbrytverktyg; Tryckt manual; Lödningskit; Verktygssats; Torx-mejsel; Videoinstruktioner; Övrigt
de: Enthaltenes Installationszubehör: Klebestreifen; Keine; Kreuzschraubenzieher; Kunststoff-Hebelwerkzeug; Gedruckte Anleitung; Lötset; Werkzeugset; Torx-Schraubenzieher; Videoanleitung; Sonstiges
es: Accesorios de instalación incluidos: Tiras adhesivas; Ninguno; Destornillador Phillips; Herramienta plástica de palanca; Manual impreso; Kit de soldadura; Kit de herramientas; Destornillador Torx; Instrucciones en video; Otros
fr: Accessoires d’installation inclus: Bandes adhésives; Aucune; Tournevis Phillips; Outil de levier en plastique; Manuel imprimé; Kit de soudure; Kit d'outils; Tournevis Torx; Instructions vidéo; Autre
pl: Dołączone akcesoria instalacyjne: Paski samoprzylepne; Brak; Śrubokręt krzyżakowy; Plastikowe narzędzie do podważania; Instrukcja drukowana; Zestaw do lutowania; Zestaw narzędzi; Śrubokręt torx; Instrukcje wideo; Inne
lt-LT: Pridėti montavimo priedai: Klijuojamos juostelės; Nėra; Kryžminis atsuktuvas; Plastikinis atplėšimo įrankis; Spausdinta instrukcija; Litavimo rinkinys; Įrankių rinkinys; Torx atsuktuvas; Vaizdo instrukcijos; Kita
zh-TW: 隨附的安裝配件: 黏貼條; 無; 十字螺絲起子; 塑膠撬棒; 紙本說明書; 焊接套件; 工具組; 星形螺絲起子; 影片說明; 其他
ja: 同梱の設置アクセサリー: 粘着テープ; なし; プラスドライバー; プラスチックこじ開けツール; 印刷マニュアル; はんだ付けキット; ツールキット; トルクスドライバー; ビデオ説明書; その他
nl: Meegeleverde installatie-accessoires: Kleefstrips; Geen; Phillips-schroevendraaier; Plastic openbreekgereedschap; Gedrukte handleiding; Soldeerkit; Gereedschapsset; Torx-schroevendraaier; Video-instructies; Andere
el: Συμπεριλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα εγκατάστασης: Αυτοκόλλητες ταινίες; Καμία; Κατσαβίδι Phillips; Πλαστικό εργαλείο ανοίγματος; Έντυπο εγχειρίδιο; Κιτ κόλλησης; Κιτ εργαλείων; Κατσαβίδι Torx; Οδηγίες βίντεο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 包含的安装配件: 粘合条; 无; 十字螺丝刀; 塑料撬具; 印刷手册; 焊接套件; 工具套件; 梅花螺丝刀; 视频说明; 其他
it: Accessori di installazione inclusi: Strisce adesive; Nessuna; Cacciavite Phillips; Strumento di leva in plastica; Manuale stampato; Kit per saldatura; Kit di attrezzi; Cacciavite Torx; Istruzioni video; Altro
cs: Přiložené instalační příslušenství: Lepicí pásky; Žádný; Křížový šroubovák; Plastový páčicí nástroj; Tištěný manuál; Pájecí sada; Sada nástrojů; Torx šroubovák; Video návod; Jiné
fi: Sisältyvät asennustarvikkeet: Liimanauhat; Ei mitään; Ristipääruuvitaltta; Muovinen avaamistyökalu; Painettu käsikirja; Juotossarja; Työkalusarja; Torx-ruuvitaltta; Video-ohjeet; Muu
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมการติดตั้งที่รวมอยู่: แถบกาว; ไม่มี; ไขควงฟิลลิปส์; เครื่องมืองัดพลาสติก; คู่มือแบบพิมพ์; ชุดบัดกรี; ชุดเครื่องมือ; ไขควงทอร์กซ์; คำแนะนำแบบวิดีโอ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Acessórios de instalação incluídos: Tiras adesivas; Nenhum; Chave de fenda Phillips; Ferramenta de abertura de plástico; Manual impresso; Kit de soldadura; Kit de ferramentas; Chave de fenda Torx; Instruções em vídeo; Outro
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo na montáž v balení: Lepiace pásky; Žiadny; Krížový skrutkovač; Plastový páčidlový nástroj; Tlačený manuál; Spájkovacia súprava; Sada nástrojov; Torx skrutkovač; Video inštrukcie; Iné
ro-RO: Accesorii de instalare incluse: Benzi adezive; Niciuna; Șurubelniță Phillips; Unealtă de deschidere din plastic; Manual tipărit; Kit de lipit; Set de unelte; Șurubelniță Torx; Instrucțiuni video; Altele
tr: Dahil edilen kurulum aksesuarları: Yapıştırıcı şeritler; Hiçbiri; Phillips tornavida; Plastik açma aleti; Basılı kılavuz; Lehim seti; Alet seti; Torx tornavida; Video talimatları; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključeni pribor za instalaciju: Ljepljive trake; Nema; Phillips odvijač; Plastični alat za otvaranje; Tiskani priručnik; Set za lemljenje; Set alata; Torx odvijač; Video upute; Ostalo
nb: Installasjonstilbehør inkludert: Limbånd; Ingen; Phillips skrutrekker; Plastoppbryterverktøy; Trykt manual; Loddesett; Verktøysett; Torx skrutrekker; Videoinstruksjoner; Annet
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za namestitev: Lepilni trakovi; Brez; Križni izvijač; Plastično orodje za odpiranje; Tiskana navodila; Komplet za spajkanje; Komplet orodja; Torx izvijač; Video navodila; Drugo
vi: Phụ kiện lắp đặt đi kèm: Dải keo dính; Không có; Tua vít phillips; Dụng cụ cạy nhựa; Sách hướng dẫn in; Bộ hàn; Bộ dụng cụ; Tua vít torx; Hướng dẫn video; Khác
hu: Mellékelt telepítési tartozékok: Ragasztócsíkok; Egyik sem; Phillips csavarhúzó; Műanyag feszítő szerszám; Nyomtatott kézikönyv; Forrasztókészlet; Szerszámkészlet; Torx csavarhúzó; Videó útmutató; Egyéb
da: Inkluderet installationstilbehør: Klæbestrimler; Ingen; Phillips skruetrækker; Plastik løfteværktøj; Trykt manual; Loddesæt; Værktøjssæt; Torx skruetrækker; Videoinstruktioner; Andet
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за монтаж: Лепящи ленти; Няма; Кръстата отвертка; Пластмасов инструмент за разглобяване; Печатно ръководство; Комплект за запояване; Комплект инструменти; Отвертка Torx; Видео инструкции; Други
ko: 포함된 설치 액세서리: 접착 스트립; 없음; 십자 드라이버; 플라스틱 분리 도구; 인쇄 매뉴얼; 납땜 키트; 도구 키트; 톡스 드라이버; 비디오 지침; 기타
en: Installation accessories included: Adhesive strips; None; Phillips screwdriver; Plastic pry tool; Printed manual; Soldering kit; Tool kit; Torx screwdriver; Video instructions; Other
ru: Аксессуары для установки в комплекте: Клейкие полоски; Нет; Крестовая отвертка; Пластиковая монтировка; Печатное руководство; Паяльный набор; Набор инструментов; Отвертка Torx; Видеоинструкции; Другой
pt-BR: Acessórios de instalação incluídos: Fitas adesivas; Nenhum; Chave de fenda Phillips; Ferramenta de abertura de plástico; Manual impresso; Kit de solda; Kit de ferramentas; Chave de fenda Torx; Instruções em vídeo; Outro